Hawaii statutes.
§143-12 Seizure and disposal of diseased
dogs; penalty. Any police officer or animal control officer may seize and,
after notice to the owner if the owner can be found, may kill any dog running
at large which is so obviously diseased as to be a menace to the health of
persons or animals.

Any owner of any dog so diseased, who recovers
the dog from the police officer or animal control officer, after notice as
aforesaid, and does not furnish forthwith suitable medical treatment and care
for, or destroy, the diseased dog, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1937, c
217, §§1, 2; RL 1945, §7161; RL 1955, §156-12; HRS §143-12; am L 1983, c 227,
§9; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next